Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-729
Articles of consolidation; filing.

The articles of consolidation shall be executed, acknowledged, filed and recorded in the same manner as the original articles of incorporation of a corporation organized under sections 70-701 to 70-738. As soon as the Secretary of State shall have accepted the articles of consolidation for filing and recording, and issued a certificate of consolidation, the proposed consolidated corporation, described in the articles under its designated name, shall be a body corporate with all of the powers of a corporation as originally organized hereunder.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 27, p. 211;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-827;

R.S.1943, § 70-729.